Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Chapter 4

Production of Fuel Alcohol

60-4-101. Licensing of fuel alcohol producers.

Except as provided by subsection (c), in this state every producer of fuel alcohol as defined in § 67-3-602 [repealed], shall be licensed annually by the department of revenue on forms approved by the commissioner.

Every producer of fuel alcohol shall be subjected to the following annual license fee:

Production of one thousand gallons (1,000 gals.) up to two thousand and five hundred gallons (2,500 gals.) annually shall require a fifty dollar ($50.00) licensing fee; and

Production of over two thousand and five hundred gallons (2,500 gals.) of fuel alcohol annually shall require a one hundred dollar ($100) licensing fee.

Production of up to one thousand gallons (1,000 gals.) of fuel alcohol annually shall require no license fee. However, anyone producing less than one thousand gallons (1,000 gals.) per year shall be required to notify the department in writing of any intention to produce fuel alcohol before such production occurs.

All fees shall be collected by the commissioner or the commissioner's designated agent; all license application and fee information shall be accessible to the alcoholic beverage commission in such form and manner as prescribed by the commissioner.

It is unlawful for any producer to fail to comply with subsections (a)-(c), and any person found guilty of doing so shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than the maximum fine provided under the general law for the commission of a misdemeanor.

The commissioner shall have the authority to establish rules and regulations relating to the licensing of producers of fuel alcohol.

Acts 1980, ch. 786, § 7; T.C.A., § 67-39-101.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Section 67-3-602, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 316, § 1.

60-4-102. Taxation of fuel alcohol — Rules and regulations concerning use and production.

Chapter 3 of this title and former title 67, chapter 3, parts 1-9 [repealed] shall apply to fuel alcohol. A person producing fuel alcohol for personal use in combustion engines or heating oil systems shall not be considered a distributor or a dealer within the meaning of chapter 3 of this title and former title 67, chapter 3, parts 1-9 [repealed]. If a person sells fuel alcohol, such person shall be deemed a distributor unless the fuel alcohol is sold to a bonded distributor or its lawful agents who must assume reporting and payment of all taxes due on such fuel alcohol.

The commissioner shall have the authority to establish rules and regulations concerning the use and production of fuel alcohol, for the administration of subsection (a).

Acts 1980, ch. 786, § 8; T.C.A., § 67-39-102.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 67, ch. 3, parts 1-9, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 316, § 1.

Cross-References. Restrictions on credit sales of gasohol prohibited, § 47-25-625.

Restrictions on dealer's supplying gasohol prohibited, § 47-25-626.